Vermont statutes. Title 4 Judiciary
Subchapter 1. Probate Districts

§ 271.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238a(a)(1), eff. February 1, 2011.

§ 272.
Probate districts; Probate judges.

There shall be one Probate district in each county, which shall be designated by the name of the county. Each Probate district shall elect one Probate judge.

To hold the position of Probate judge, a person shall be admitted by the Supreme Court to practice law. This subsection shall not apply to any person who holds the office of Probate judge on July 1, 2010.

The Administrative Judge may specially assign a Probate judge to hear a case in a geographical district other than the district for which the Probate judge was elected.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 17.

§ 273.
Repealed. 2009, No. 4, § 120, eff. April. 24, 2009.

§ 274.
Repealed. 1993, No. 171 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 1, 1994.

§§ 275-277.
Repealed. 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 238a(a)(1), eff. February 1, 2011.

§ 278.
Authorization of assistant judges.

An assistant judge or a candidate for the office of assistant judge may also seek election to the office of Probate judge, and, if otherwise qualified and elected to both offices, may serve both as an assistant judge and as Probate judge.

In the event a probate matter arises in the Superior Court over which an assistant judge is also the Probate judge that presides, or has presided, over the same or related probate matter in the Probate Court, the assistant judge shall be disqualified from hearing and deciding the probate matter in the Superior Court.

In the event a probate matter arises in the Probate Court over which a Probate judge is also an assistant judge that presides, or has presided, over the same or related probate matter in the Superior Court, the Probate judge shall be disqualified from hearing and deciding the probate matter in the Probate Court.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 17a.